el: Τύπος πέλματος ελαστικού τρακτέρ γκαζόν: Παντός εδάφους; Chevron/λοβός; Βιομηχανικού τύπου; Ραβδωτό; Λείο; Χιονιού; Χλοοτάπητα; Άλλο
it: Tipo di battistrada del trattorino rasaerba: Fuoristrada; Chevron/aletta; Industriale; A coste; Liscio; Neve; Turf; Altro
fr: Type de bande de roulement pour tracteur de pelouse: Tout-terrain; Chevron/crampons; Industriel; Nervuré; Lisse; Neige; Gazon; Autre
fi: Nurmikontraktorin kulutuspinnan tyyppi: Maastokelpoinen; Chevron/karkea; Teollisuuskäyttöinen; Harjanteinen; Sileä; Lumi; Nurmi; Muu
zh-TW: 草坪拖拉機胎紋類型: 全地形; 人字紋/凸耳; 工業; 羅紋; 光滑; 雪用; 草皮; 其他
zh-CN: 草坪拖拉机轮胎胎面类型: 全地形; 人字形/凸纹; 工业用; 肋条形; 光明; 雪地用; 草坪用; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta gazne površine vrtnog traktora: Svi tereni; Chevron/izbočine; Industrijski; Rebrasta; Glatka; Snijeg; Trava; Ostalo
ru: Тип протектора шин садового трактора: Вездеходный; Шевронный/с грунтозацепом; Индустриальный; Продольный; Гладкий; Для снега; Для газона; Другой
vi: Loại gai lốp xe kéo sân vườn: Mọi địa hình; Vân hình chữ V/gai lốp lớn; Công nghiệp; Có gân; Nhẵn; Lốp đi tuyết; Cỏ; Khác
th: ประเภทดอกยางของรถตัดหญ้า: ทุกพื้นที่; ดอกยางลายก้างปลา/ลายบั้งลึก; อุตสาหกรรม; แบบร่อง; เรียบ; หิมะ; สนามหญ้า; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de banda de rodagem do trator corta-relva: Todo-o-terreno; Chevron/Com ressaltos; Industrial; Radial; Macio; Neve; Relva; Outro
ja: 芝刈り機のトレッドタイプ: 全地形対応; シェブロン/ラグ; 産業; リブ付き; スムース; 雪; 芝地; その他
de: Typ des Rasentraktorreifens: Geländetauglich; Chevron/Lug; Industriell; Gerippt; Glatt; Schnee; Rasenprofil; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ behúňa traktoru na kosenie trávnika: Terénny; V tvare V/štupľový; Priemyselný; Vrúbkovaný; Hladký; Snežný; Trávnikový; Iné
lt-LT: Vejos traktoriaus padangos protektoriaus tipas: Pravažus; Ševronas / kilpa; Pramoninis; Briaunotas; Glotnus; Sniegas; Veja; Kita
nb: Trådmønster for plentraktor: Terreng; Chevron/lug; Industriell; Med riller; Glatt; Snø; Gress; Annet
sv: Typ av traktordäck för grästraktor: Terräng; Chevron/klack; Industriell; Ribbad; Slät; Snö; Torva; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип грайфер на гуми за градински трактор: Всички терени; Селскостопанско; Индустриално; Оребрено; Гладко; Сняг; Торф; Друго
ko: 잔디 트랙터 트레드 유형: 모든 지형; 쉐브론/러그; 인더스트리얼; 골이 있는; 매끄러운; 눈; 잔디용; 기타
nl: Type profiel van gazonmaaier: All-terrain; Chevron-profiel; Industrieel; Geribbeld; Glad; Sneeuw; Gazonprofiel; Overig
tr: Çim biçme traktörü lastik tipi: Tüm arazi türlerine uygun; Chevron / dişli; Endüstriyel; Yivli; Düz; Kar; Çim; Diğer
es: Tipo de banda de rodadura del tractor cortacésped: Todo terreno; Chevron/orejeta; Industrial; Acanalado; Suave; Nieve; Césped; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta profila traktorske kosilnice: Vsi tereni; Ševron/uh; Industrijski; Rebrasta; Gladka; Sneg; Travnik; Druga
hu: Fűnyíró traktor futófelületének típusa: Terepjáró; Ék alakú/fül; Ipari; Bordázott; Sima; Hó; Gyep; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul benzii de rulare a tractorului de tuns iarba: Toate tipurile de teren; Șevron/gheare; Industrial; Dungat; Neted; Zăpadă; Gazon; Altele
pl: Typ bieżnika traktora ogrodowego: Terenowy; Bieżnik chevron / terenowy; Przemysłowy; Żebrowany; Gładki; Śnieżny; Trawnikowy; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Tipo de esteira para trator de cortar grama: Qualquer terreno; Chevron/com garras; Industrial; Com nervuras; Suave; Neve; Grama; Outro
cs: Dezén pneumatik pro travní traktor: Do každého terénu; Šípový; Průmyslové; Drážky; Hladké; Na sníh; Na trávník; Jiné
en: Lawn tractor tread type: All-terrain; Chevron/lug; Industrial; Ribbed; Smooth; Snow; Turf; Other
da: Havetraktors dækmønstertype: Alt terræn; Chevron/lug; Industri; Med riller; Glat; Sne; Græs; Andet